Illinois, session 104th, SB429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public University Energy Conservation Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 62/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Public University Energy Conservation Act.9(Source: P.A. 90-486, eff. 8-17-97.)